Massachusetts, session 194th, H5570.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the town of Nahant may by ordinance prohibit the application of first,
second or future generation anticoagulant rodenticides by any professional pest control
companies within the town of Nahant. including application of such pesticides by licensed
commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R. 10.00, except as allowed by the town’s board
of health to remediate a public health condition.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1